lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_finalE-hop.txt
!==================================================
LEXICON NounInflIX
!  for noun roots that end in -e that can be hopped
!==================================================

!-----------------------------------------|
!               ABSOLUTIVE                |
!-----------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[Abs.Sg]:^0                    PostInflIX; ^[Abs.Pl]:^t                     PostInflIX; ^[Abs.Du]:^k                  PostInflIX;
!-----------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[Abs.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ka    PostInflIX; ^[Abs.1SgPoss.Pl]:^nka           PostInflIX; ^[Abs.1SgPoss.Du]:^gka        PostInflIX;
^[Abs.1PlPoss.Sg]:^vut          PostInflIX; ^[Abs.1PlPoss.Pl]:^put           PostInflIX; ^[Abs.1PlPoss.Du]:^gput       PostInflIX;
^[Abs.1DuPoss.Sg]:^vung         PostInflIX; ^[Abs.1DuPoss.Pl]:^pung          PostInflIX; ^[Abs.1DuPoss.Du]:^gpung      PostInflIX;
!-----------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[Abs.2SgPoss.Sg]:^n            PostInflIX; ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Pl]:^ten           PostInflIX; ^[Abs.2SgPoss.Du]:^gken       PostInflIX;
^[Abs.2PlPoss.Sg]:^zi           PostInflIX; ^[Abs.2PlPoss.Pl]:^si            PostInflIX; ^[Abs.2PlPoss.Du]:^gsi        PostInflIX;
^[Abs.2DuPoss.Sg]:^yek          PostInflIX; ^[Abs.2DuPoss.Pl]:^tek           PostInflIX; ^[Abs.2DuPoss.Du]:^gtek       PostInflIX;
!-----------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[Abs.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}nga   PostInflIX; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngi    PostInflIX; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}kek PostInflIX;
^[Abs.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}nga  PostInflIX; ^[Abs.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngi   PostInflIX;                                         |
^[Abs.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngat  PostInflIX; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngit   PostInflIX; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Du]:^gket       PostInflIX;
^[Abs.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngat PostInflIX; ^[Abs.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngit  PostInflIX;                                         |
^[Abs.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngak  PostInflIX; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngik   PostInflIX; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Du]:^gkek       PostInflIX;
^[Abs.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngak PostInflIX; ^[Abs.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngik  PostInflIX;                                         |
!-----------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
^[Abs.4SgPoss.Sg]:^ni           PostInflIX; ^[Abs.4SgPoss.Pl]:^ni            PostInflIX; ^[Abs.4SgPoss.Du]:^gni        PostInflIX;
^[Abs.4PlPoss.Sg]:^yeng         PostInflIX; ^[Abs.4PlPoss.Pl]:^teng          PostInflIX; ^[Abs.4PlPoss.Du]:^gteng      PostInflIX;
^[Abs.4DuPoss.Sg]:^yek          PostInflIX; ^[Abs.4DuPoss.Pl]:^tek           PostInflIX; ^[Abs.4DuPoss.Du]:^gtek       PostInflIX;
!-----------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
! %{%.fS%.%} ^[Jacobson (2001) p.38]

!------------------------------------------|
!      RELATIVE (ergative & genitive)      |
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.Sg]:^m                     PostInflIX; ^[Rel.Pl]:^t                     PostInflIX; ^[Rel.Du]:^k               PostInflIX;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.1SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ma     PostInflIX; ^[Rel.1SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ma     PostInflIX; ^[Rel.1SgPoss.Du]:^gma     PostInflIX;
^[Rel.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mta           PostInflIX; ^[Rel.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mta           PostInflIX; ^[Rel.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemta   PostInflIX;
^[Rel.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtung         PostInflIX; ^[Rel.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtung         PostInflIX; ^[Rel.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtung PostInflIX;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpek          PostInflIX; ^[Rel.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpek          PostInflIX; ^[Rel.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpek    PostInflIX;
^[Rel.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesi         PostInflIX; ^[Rel.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesi         PostInflIX; ^[Rel.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesi   PostInflIX;
^[Rel.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetek        PostInflIX; ^[Rel.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetek        PostInflIX; ^[Rel.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetek  PostInflIX;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngan   PostInflIX; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngan   PostInflIX; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkenka  PostInflIX;
^[Rel.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngan  PostInflIX; ^[Rel.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngan  PostInflIX;                                      |
^[Rel.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngita  PostInflIX; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngita  PostInflIX; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Du]:^gkenka  PostInflIX;
^[Rel.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngita PostInflIX; ^[Rel.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngita PostInflIX;                                      |
^[Rel.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngita  PostInflIX; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngita  PostInflIX; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Du]:^gkenka  PostInflIX;
^[Rel.3DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngita PostInflIX; ^[Rel.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngita PostInflIX;                                      |
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|
^[Rel.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mi     PostInflIX; ^[Rel.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mi     PostInflIX; ^[Rel.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmi     PostInflIX;
^[Rel.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meng   PostInflIX; ^[Rel.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meng   PostInflIX; ^[Rel.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmeng   PostInflIX;
^[Rel.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meng   PostInflIX; ^[Rel.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meng   PostInflIX; ^[Rel.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmeng   PostInflIX;
!------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------|

!-------------------------------------------------|
!                ABLATIVE MODALIS                 |
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meng              PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.Pl]:^neng                     PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.Du]:^gneng                    PostInflIX;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mneng            PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mneng            PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemneng          PostInflIX;
^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mnneng           PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mnneng           PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemnneng         PostInflIX;
^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegneng         PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegneng         PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegneng       PostInflIX;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpeneng          PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpeneng          PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpeneng          PostInflIX;
^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpegneng         PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpegneng         PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpegneng         PostInflIX;
^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesineng        PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesineng        PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesineng        PostInflIX;
^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegneng       PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegneng       PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegneng       PostInflIX;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}nganeng   PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}nganeng   PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkeneng          PostInflIX;
^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}nganeng  PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}nganeng  PostInflIX;                                                   |
^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngitneng  PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitneng  PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitneng  PostInflIX;
^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.3PlPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflIX;
^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Sg]:^gkeneng          PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngitneng  PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.f.%}ngitneng  PostInflIX;
                                                    ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.3DuPoss.Du]:^%{.fS.%}ngitneng PostInflIX;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mineng    PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}mineng    PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.4SgPoss.Du]:^gmineng          PostInflIX;
^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}meggneng  PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}meggneng  PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.4PlPoss.Du]:^gmeggneng        PostInflIX;
^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megneng   PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megneng   PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegneng         PostInflIX;
^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}megteneng PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}megteneng PostInflIX; ^[Abl_Mod.4DuPoss.Du]:^gmegteneng       PostInflIX;
!-------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------------|

!-------------------------------------------|
!            LOCATIVE (localis)             |
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.Sg]:^%{.f.%}mi              PostInflIX; ^[Loc.Pl]:^ni                     PostInflIX; ^[Loc.Du]:^gni                    PostInflIX;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.1SgPoss.Sg]:^mni            PostInflIX; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Pl]:^mni            PostInflIX; ^[Loc.1SgPoss.Du]:^gemni          PostInflIX;
^[Loc.1PlPoss.Sg]:^mnni           PostInflIX; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Pl]:^mnni           PostInflIX; ^[Loc.1PlPoss.Du]:^gemnni         PostInflIX;
^[Loc.1DuPoss.Sg]:^mtegni         PostInflIX; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Pl]:^mtegni         PostInflIX; ^[Loc.1DuPoss.Du]:^gemtegni       PostInflIX;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpeni          PostInflIX; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpeni          PostInflIX; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpeni          PostInflIX;
^[Loc.2SgPoss.Sg]:^gpegni         PostInflIX; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Pl]:^gpegni         PostInflIX; ^[Loc.2SgPoss.Du]:^gpegni         PostInflIX;
^[Loc.2PlPoss.Sg]:^gpesini        PostInflIX; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Pl]:^gpesini        PostInflIX; ^[Loc.2PlPoss.Du]:^gpesini        PostInflIX;
^[Loc.2DuPoss.Sg]:^gpetegni       PostInflIX; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Pl]:^gpetegni       PostInflIX; ^[Loc.2DuPoss.Du]:^gpetegni       PostInflIX;
!-------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------------|
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.f.%}ngani   PostInflIX; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.f.%}ngani   PostInflIX; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Du]:^gkeni          PostInflIX;
^[Loc.3SgPoss.Sg]:^%{.fS.%}ngani  PostInflIX; ^[Loc.3SgPoss.Pl]:^%{.fS.%}ngani  PostInflIX;                                             |
